South Dakota, session 2026, HB1013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-12-52.3 be AMENDED:
32-12-52.3. Upon a first conviction or a first adjudication of delinquency for any
violation, while in a vehicle, of § 22-42-5, 22-42-5.1, 22-42-6, 22-42-7, 22-42-8, 22-42-
9, 22-42A-3, or 22-42A-4, the court shall revoke the driver license or driving privilege of
the individual convicted for a period of ninety days.
Upon a second or subsequent conviction or a second or subsequent adjudication of
delinquency for a violation, while in a vehicle, of § 22-42-5, 22-42-5.1, 22-42-6, 22-42-
7, 22-42-8, 22-42-9, 22-42A-3, or 22-42A-4, the court shall revoke the driver license or
driving privilege of the individual convicted for a period of one year, or until the individual's
seventeenth birthday, whichever is a longer period of time.
For any offense under this section, the court may issue an order, upon proof of
financial responsibility pursuant to § 32-35-43.1, permitting the individual to operate a
vehicle for purposes of the person's employment, child care delivery or pickup, health
appointments, or attendance at school, court, probation appointments, 24/7 sobriety
testing, counseling programs, treatment, or aftercare.
Notwithstanding the provisions of chapters 26-7A, 26-8A, 26-8B, and 26-8C, the
Unified Judicial System shall notify the Department of Public Safety of any conviction or
adjudication of delinquency for a violation, while in a vehicle, of § 22-42-5, 22-42-5.1,
22-42-6, 22-42-7, 22-42-8, 22-42-9, 22-42A-3, or 22-42A-4. The period of revocation
must begin on the date ordered by the court or on the date specified in the notice from
the department, whichever date is earlier. At the expiration of the revocation period, the
individual may apply to reinstate the person's license as provided by law and shall pay the
license fee prescribed in § 32-12-47.1.

26.289.10 2 1013
Section 2. That § 32-35-122 be AMENDED:
32-35-122. Upon suspending a person's driving privileges pursuant to § 32-35-
121, the magistrate judge or circuit judge must restrict the person's driving privileges to
only permit the operation of a motor vehicle for purposes of the person's employment,
child care delivery or pickup, health appointments, or attendance at school, court,
probation appointments, 24/7 sobriety testing, counseling programs, treatment, or
aftercare.
Before the person is permitted to drive, the person must establish one of the forms
of financial responsibility specified in § 32-35-113. The person shall maintain financial
responsibility for the period of the restriction. The restriction must remain in effect for the
period of suspension required by § 32-35-121.
HB1013 ENROLLED

26.289.10 3 1013
An Act to clarify the purposes permitted for certain offenders to operate a motor vehicle.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1013
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1013 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1013 ENROLLED